Maryland, session 2026, HB0062.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
8–401.
(b) (1) Whenever any landlord shall desire to repossess any premises to which
the landlord is entitled under the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the landlord
or the landlord’s duly qualified agent or attorney shall ensure that the landlord has
completed the procedures required under subsection (c) of this section.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0062*

HOUSE BILL 62
(2) Subject to § 8–406 of this subtitle and after completing the procedures
required under subsection (c) of this section, a landlord or the landlord’s duly qualified
agent or attorney may file the landlord’s written complaint under oath or affirmation, in
the District Court of the county wherein the property is situated:
(i) Describing in general terms the property sought to be
repossessed;
(ii) Setting forth the name of each tenant to whom the property is
rented or any assignee or subtenant;
(iii) Stating the amount of rent and any late fees due and unpaid, less
the amount of any utility bills, fees, or security deposits paid by a tenant under § 7–309 of
the Public Utilities Article;
(iv) Requesting to repossess the premises and, if requested by the
landlord, a judgment for the amount of rent due, costs, and any late fees, less the amount
of any utility bills, fees, or security deposits paid by a tenant under § 7–309 of the Public
Utilities Article;
(v) If applicable, stating that, to the best of the landlord’s knowledge,
the tenant is deceased, intestate, and without next of kin; and
(vi) If the property to be repossessed is an affected property as
defined in § 6–801 of the Environment Article, stating that the landlord has registered the
affected property as required under § 6–811 of the Environment Article and renewed the
registration as required under § 6–812 of the Environment Article and:
1. A. If the current tenant moved into the property on or
after February 24, 1996, stating the inspection certificate number for the inspection
conducted for the current tenancy as required under § 6–815(c) of the Environment Article;
or
B. On or after February 24, 2006, stating the inspection
certificate number for the inspection conducted for the current tenancy as required under
§ 6–815(c), § 6–817(b), or § 6–819(f) of the Environment Article; or
2. Stating that the owner is unable to provide an inspection
certificate number because:
A. The owner has requested that the tenant allow the owner
access to the property to perform the work required under Title 6, Subtitle 8 of the
Environment Article;
B. The owner has offered to relocate the tenant in order to
allow the owner to perform work if the work will disturb the paint on the interior surfaces

HOUSE BILL 62 3
of the property and to pay the reasonable expenses the tenant would incur directly related
to the relocation; and
C. The tenant has refused to allow access to the owner or
refused to vacate the property in order for the owner to perform the required work.
(3) For the purpose of the court’s determination under subsection (e) of this
section the landlord shall also specify the amount of rent due for each rental period under
the lease, the day that the rent is due for each rental period, and any late fees for overdue
rent payments.
(4) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (8) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE District Court shall issue its summons, directed to any constable or
sheriff of the county entitled to serve process, and ordering the constable or sheriff to notify
the tenant, assignee, or subtenant by first–class mail:
(i) To appear before the District Court at the trial to be held on the
fifth day after the filing of the complaint; and
(ii) To answer the landlord’s complaint to show cause why the
demand of the landlord should not be granted.
(5) (i) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (8) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE constable or sheriff shall proceed to serve the summons upon the
tenant, assignee, or subtenant or their known or authorized agent as follows:
1. If personal service is requested and any of the persons
whom the sheriff shall serve is found on the property, the sheriff shall serve any such
persons; or
2. If personal service is requested and none of the persons
whom the sheriff is directed to serve shall be found on the property and, in all cases where
personal service is not requested, the constable or sheriff shall affix an attested copy of the
summons conspicuously upon the property.
(ii) The affixing of the summons upon the property after due
notification to the tenant, assignee, or subtenant by first–class mail shall conclusively be
presumed to be a sufficient service to all persons to support the entry of a default judgment
for possession of the premises, together with court costs, in favor of the landlord, but it shall
not be sufficient service to support a default judgment in favor of the landlord for the
amount of rent due.
(6) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (1) through (5) of this
subsection:
(i) In an action to repossess nonresidential property under this
section, service of process on a tenant:

HOUSE BILL 62
1. Shall be directed to the sheriff of the appropriate county
or municipality; and
2. On plaintiff’s request, may be directed to any person
authorized under the Maryland Rules to serve process; and
(ii) In Wicomico County, in an action to repossess any premises
under this section, service of process on a tenant may be directed to any person authorized
under the Maryland Rules to serve process.
(7) (i) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (4) through (6) of
this subsection, if the landlord certifies to the court in the written complaint required under
paragraph (1) of this subsection that, to the best of the landlord’s knowledge, the tenant is
deceased, intestate, and without next of kin, the District Court shall issue its summons,
directed to any constable or sheriff of the county entitled to serve process, and ordering the
constable or sheriff to notify the occupant of the premises or the next of kin of the deceased
tenant, if known, by personal service:
1. To appear before the District Court at the trial to be held
on the fifth day after the filing of the complaint; and
2. To answer the landlord’s complaint to show cause why the
demand of the landlord should not be granted.
(ii) 1. The constable or sheriff shall proceed to serve the
summons upon the occupant of the premises or the next of kin of the deceased tenant, if
known, as follows:
A. If any of the persons whom the sheriff is directed to serve
are found on the property or at another known address, the sheriff shall serve any such
persons; or
B. If none of the persons whom the sheriff is directed to serve
are found on the property or at another known address, the constable or sheriff shall affix
an attested copy of the summons conspicuously upon the property.
2. The affixing of the summons upon the property shall
conclusively be presumed to be a sufficient service to all persons to support the entry of a
default judgment for possession of the premises, together with court costs, in favor of the
landlord, but it shall not be sufficient service to support a default judgment in favor of the
landlord for the amount of rent due.
(8) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH APPLIES ONLY IN ANNE ARUNDEL
COUNTY.

HOUSE BILL 62 5
(II) NOTWITHSTANDING PARAGRAPHS (4) AND (5) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE DISTRICT COURT SHALL ISSUE ITS SUMMONS, DIRECTED TO ANY
CONSTABLE OR SHERIFF’S DESIGNEE OF THE COUNTY ENTITLED TO SERVE
PROCESS, AND ORDERING THE CONSTABLE OR SHERIFF’S DESIGNEE TO NOTIFY THE
TENANT, ASSIGNEE, OR SUBTENANT BY FIRST–CLASS MAIL TO:
1. APPEAR BEFORE THE DISTRICT COURT AT THE TRIAL
TO BE HELD ON THE THIRTIETH DAY AFTER THE FILING OF THE COMPLAINT; AND
2. ANSWER THE LANDLORD’S COMPLAINT TO SHOW
CAUSE WHY THE DEMAND OF THE LANDLORD SHOULD NOT BE GRANTED.
(III) A SHERIFF’S DESIGNEE HAS THE SAME AUTHORITY AND
RESPONSIBILITY AS A CONSTABLE OR SHERIFF IDENTIFIED IN PARAGRAPHS (5)(I)
AND (7) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(IV) A SHERIFF’S DESIGNEE SHALL POST A NOTICE OF A TRIAL
AT THE PROPERTY OR ANOTHER KNOWN ADDRESS OF THE TENANT, ASSIGNEE, OR
SUBTENANT AT LEAST 7 DAYS BEFORE THE DATE OF THE TRIAL.
(V) THE DISTRICT COURT MAY NOT DIRECT A CONSTABLE OR
SHERIFF’S DESIGNEE TO SERVE PROCESS TO APPEAR BEFORE THE DISTRICT COURT
IN A MATTER UNDER THIS SECTION FOR A GIVEN DAY IF THE NUMBER OF MATTERS
BEFORE THE DISTRICT COURT ON THAT DAY EXCEEDS 100.
(VI) IF SERVICE IS DIRECTED TO A CONSTABLE OR SHERIFF’S
DESIGNEE, THE SERVICE FEE SHALL BE PAID DIRECTLY TO THE SHERIFF’S OFFICE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.